Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7605
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-7605 to 71-7611 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Health Care Funding Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1070, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 324, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 1427, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 692, § 13;

Laws 2002, LB 1148, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB480, § 1.